Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Airport Safety and Security

183.880.
Establishment of safety and security department by airport board — Oath by appointees.

The airport board created by a county containing a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, an urban-county government, or created jointly by a city of the first class and county is authorized to establish a safety and security department and appoint safety and security officers and other employees for the public airport for which it is responsible, to prescribe distinctive uniforms for the safety and security officers of the airport board, and to designate and operate emergency vehicles. Safety and security officers so appointed shall take an appropriate oath of office, in form and manner consistent with the Constitution of Kentucky, and shall serve at the pleasure of the airport board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 2; 2014, ch. 92, § 263, effective January 1, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Airport Authority, as the air board, has the authority to establish and fix reasonable charges or fees, to be applied to UPS, for the rendition of emergency service involving UPS aircraft rendered either on the airfield or UPS ramps, either for an annual fee, or on a per occasion basis.

OAG 85-97

.

Under the explicit language of KRS

183.476

, the air board, i.e., the Regional Airport Authority, has the power, inter alia, to establish an airport and to maintain, equip and operate such airport. Implicit within that operational power is the authority to provide emergency crashfire rescue service to aircraft utilizing the airport runways. The aircraft of the UPS air parcel delivery operation is integrated with the operation of the airfield, since UPS aircraft land and take off on the regular runways at Standiford Field, although their aircraft are parked and normally fueled on the UPS ramps. Therefore, the Authority may enter into an agreement with the city of Louisville by which the Authority undertakes to render such emergency service to UPS aircraft which may be in trouble either on the airfield runways or when they reach the UPS parking ramps.

OAG 85-97

.

183.881.
Powers and duties of safety and security officers. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Safety and security officers so appointed shall be peace officers and conservators of the peace. They shall have general police powers to arrest, without process, all persons who within their view commit any crime or misdemeanor. They shall possess all of the common law and statutory powers, privileges, and immunities of sheriffs, except that they shall be empowered to serve civil process to the extent authorized by the employing airport board. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such safety and security officers are hereby specifically authorized and empowered, and it shall be their duty:

To preserve the peace, maintain order and prevent unlawful use of force or violence or other unlawful conduct on the airport facility of their respective airport board, and to protect all persons and property located thereon from injury, harm and damage;

To enforce, and to assist officials of their respective airport boards in the enforcement of the lawful rules and regulations of said airport board, and to assist and cooperate with the law enforcement agencies and officers.

Provided, however, that such safety and security officers shall exercise the powers herein granted upon any real property owned or occupied by their respective airport boards including the streets passing through and adjacent thereto. Said powers may be exercised in any county of the Commonwealth where the airport board owns, uses, or occupies property. Additional jurisdiction may be established by agreement with the chief of police of the municipality or sheriff of the county or the appropriate law enforcement agency in which such property is located, dependent upon the jurisdiction involved.

Safety and security officers may exercise their powers away from the locations described in subsection (1) of this section only upon the following conditions:

When in hot pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law;

When authorized to do so pursuant to the agreement authorized by subsection (1) of this section;

When requested to act by the chief of police of the city or county in which the airport board’s property is located;

When requested to act by the sheriff of the county in which the airport board’s property is located;

When requested to act by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

When requested to act by the authorized delegates of those persons or agencies listed in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) above;

When requested to assist a state, county, or municipal police officer, sheriff, or other peace officer in the performance of his or her lawful duties; or

When operating under an interlocal cooperation agreement pursuant to KRS Chapter 65.

Safety and security officers appointed pursuant to KRS

183.110

and

183.880

to

183.886

shall have, in addition to the other powers enumerated herein, the power to conduct investigations anywhere in this Commonwealth, provided such investigation relates to criminal offenses which occurred on property owned, leased, or controlled by the airport board. Where desirable and at the discretion of the airport board’s police officials, the airport board’s safety and security department may coordinate said investigations with any law enforcement agency of this Commonwealth or with agencies of the federal government.

Safety and security departments created and operated by the airport boards shall, for all purposes, be deemed public police departments and the sworn safety and security officers thereof are, for all purposes, deemed public police officers.

Nothing in KRS

183.110

and

183.880

to

183.886

shall be construed as a diminution or modification of the authority or responsibility of any city or county police department, the Department of Kentucky State Police, sheriff, constable, or other peace officer either on the property of an airport board or otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 3; 2007, ch. 85, § 187, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Airport safety and security officers have all of the powers and authority enumerated for special law enforcement officers in KRS

61.900

to KRS

61.926

, in addition to those powers enumerated in this section, since subsection (6)(e) of KRS

61.900

includes public airport authority security officers in its definition of “special law enforcement officer.”

OAG 81-396

.

With respect to the arrest powers of airport safety and security officers, the phrase “who within their view commit” contained in subsection (1) of this section means, if a misdemeanor is involved, a crime committed in the physical presence of the officer; if a felony is involved, the phrase “within their view” means those factors within the officer’s knowledge which constitute probable cause, as opposed to physical sight or presence.

OAG 81-396

.

183.881.
Powers and duties of safety and security officers. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Safety and security officers so appointed shall be peace officers and conservators of the peace. They shall have general police powers to arrest, without process, all persons who within their view commit any crime or misdemeanor. They shall possess all of the common law and statutory powers, privileges, and immunities of sheriffs, except that they shall be empowered to serve civil process to the extent authorized by the employing airport board. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such safety and security officers are hereby specifically authorized and empowered, and it shall be their duty:

To preserve the peace, maintain order and prevent unlawful use of force or violence or other unlawful conduct on the airport facility of their respective airport board, and to protect all persons and property located thereon from injury, harm and damage;

To enforce, and to assist officials of their respective airport boards in the enforcement of the lawful rules and regulations of said airport board, and to assist and cooperate with the law enforcement agencies and officers.

Provided, however, that such safety and security officers shall exercise the powers herein granted upon any real property owned or occupied by their respective airport boards including the streets passing through and adjacent thereto. Said powers may be exercised in any county of the Commonwealth where the airport board owns, uses, or occupies property. Additional jurisdiction may be established by agreement with the chief of police of the municipality or sheriff of the county or the appropriate law enforcement agency in which such property is located, dependent upon the jurisdiction involved.

Safety and security officers may exercise their powers away from the locations described in subsection (1) of this section only upon the following conditions:

When in hot pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law;

When authorized to do so pursuant to the agreement authorized by subsection (1) of this section;

When requested to act by the chief of police of the city or county in which the airport board’s property is located;

When requested to act by the sheriff of the county in which the airport board’s property is located;

When requested to act by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

When requested to act by the authorized delegates of those persons or agencies listed in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of this subsection;

When requested to assist a state, county, or municipal police officer, sheriff, or other peace officer in the performance of his or her lawful duties; or

When operating under an interlocal cooperation agreement pursuant to KRS Chapter 65.

Safety and security officers appointed pursuant to KRS

183.110

and

183.880

to

183.886

shall have, in addition to the other powers enumerated herein, the power to conduct investigations anywhere in this Commonwealth, provided such investigation relates to criminal offenses which occurred on property owned, leased, or controlled by the airport board. Where desirable and at the discretion of the airport board’s police officials, the airport board’s safety and security department may coordinate said investigations with any law enforcement agency of this Commonwealth or with agencies of the federal government.

Safety and security departments created and operated by the airport boards shall, for all purposes, be deemed public police departments and the sworn safety and security officers thereof are, for all purposes, deemed public police officers.

Nothing in KRS

183.110

and

183.880

to

183.886

shall be construed as a diminution or modification of the authority or responsibility of any city or county police department, the Department of Kentucky State Police, sheriff, constable granted police powers, or other peace officer either on the property of an airport board or otherwise. Nor shall anything in KRS

183.110

and

183.880

to

183.886

be construed as a diminution or modification of the authority or responsibility of any constable.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 3; 2007, ch. 85, § 187, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 90, § 20, effective January 1, 2023.

183.8811.
Use of electronic equipment for security functions — Precautionary procedures when bomb, explosive or deadly weapon suspected.

An air board may utilize electronic equipment or such techniques and procedures as it determines necessary to insure the safety of the public on airplanes and on airport property from persons using or attempting to use bombs, explosives, firearms or other deadly weapons. When a bomb, explosive or other deadly weapon is detected on airport property, or there is good reason to suspect that an individual may have such a device or weapon that he is attempting to conceal from proper authorities, a law enforcement officer, airline employee or air board agent or employee may take prudent and necessary precautionary measures to protect individual lives and property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

183.882.
Qualifications of safety and security officers.

All persons appointed as safety and security officers pursuant to KRS

183.110

and

183.880

to

183.886

shall, at the time of their employment, be:

Not less than eighteen (18) years of age; and

Comply with the requirements of KRS

61.300

, other than the age and residency requirements; and

Shall possess whatever other requirements as may be set by the airport board which employs them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 4.

183.883.
Appointment, promotion and compensation of personnel.

The airport board may provide for the appointment or promotion to the ranks and grades and positions of the department such officers and civilians as are considered by the airport board to be necessary for the efficient administration of the department. Such officers and civilians shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed and paid by the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 5.

183.884.
Emergency vehicles — Equipment — Reporting of criminal statistics.

Vehicles used for emergency purposes by the safety and security department of an airport board shall be considered as emergency vehicles and shall be equipped with blue lights and sirens and shall be operated in conformance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 189.

Safety and security departments of the airport boards may install, maintain, and operate radio systems on police or other frequencies under licenses issued by the Federal Communications Commission, or its successor.

Safety and security departments of airport boards shall comply with the requirements of the Kentucky Revised Statutes and the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet with regard to reporting of criminal and other statistics.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 6; 2007, ch. 85, § 188, effective June 26, 2007.

183.885.
Traffic and parking regulation powers.

The airport boards, each having the power and authority to govern and control the method and purpose of use of property owned or occupied by their respective airports, including travel over such property, is each hereby confirmed in its authority to regulate the traffic and parking of motor vehicles or other vehicles as well as the traffic of pedestrians on, over and across the runways, streets, roads, paths and grounds of real property owned, used or occupied by such airport. Such regulations applicable to traffic and parking may include, but not be limited to, the following provisions:

Provisions governing the registration, speed, operation, parking and times, places and manner of use of motor vehicles, and other vehicles.

Provisions prescribing penalties for the violation of such regulations, which penalties may include the imposition of reasonable charges, the removing and impounding (at the expense of the violator) of vehicles which are operated or parked in violation of such regulations, and the denial of permission to operate vehicles on the property of such airport.

Provisions establishing reasonable charges and fees for the registration of vehicles and for the use of parking spaces or facilities owned or occupied by such airport.

Provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be deemed to limit or restrict the powers of any other governmental authority having jurisdiction over public streets, roads, or ways.

Motor vehicle moving violations of regulations issued under this section shall be deemed violations of the appropriate equivalent sections of the motor vehicle laws of the Commonwealth and may be prosecuted in the courts having territorial jurisdiction over the physical location of the offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 7.

183.886.
Impersonation of officer.

No person shall falsely represent himself to be a safety and security officer, agent or employee of a safety and security department of an airport board and in such assumed character, arrest, or detain or search, or question, in any manner the person or property of any person, nor shall any person without the authority of the airport board wear its official uniform, insignia, badge, or identification of the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 300, § 8(1).

183.887.
Pointing laser or other light at aircraft operator.

As used in this section, “laser” means any device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic radiation by stimulated emission that emits a beam.

A person shall not knowingly direct at an aircraft any light emitted from a laser device or any other source which is capable of interfering with the vision of a person operating the aircraft.

This section shall not apply to:

An authorized individual in the conduct of research and development or flight test operations conducted by an aircraft manufacturer, the Federal Aviation Administration, or any other person authorized by the Federal Aviation Administration to conduct such research and development or flight test operations; or

Members or elements of the United States Department of Defense or United States Department of Homeland Security acting in an official capacity for the purpose of research, development, operations, testing, or training.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 114, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.